Arkansas, session 2025, HB1131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 87, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
17-87-107. Delegation of certain nursing tasks.
(a)(1) An advanced practice registered nurse may delegate certain
nursing tasks to a qualified and trained healthcare worker who is not
licensed or otherwise authorized by state law to perform the nursing task.
(2) A nursing task to be delegated under this section may
include the following tasks and any additional tasks authorized by the
Arkansas State Board of Nursing:
(A) The administration of medications and immunizations
that do not require specialized judgment and skill based on knowledge and
application of the principles of biological, physical, and social sciences as
determined by the Arkansas State Board of Nursing; and
(B) Phlebotomy activities.
(b) If an advanced practice registered nurse delegates a nursing task
*JMB075*
04-09-2025 15:42:27 JMB075

As Engrossed: S4/8/25 S4/9/25 HB1131
under this section:
(1) The advanced practice registered nurse shall remain
responsible for the acts of the healthcare worker providing the delegated
task; and
(2) The healthcare worker performing the delegated task shall:
(A) Not be represented to the public as a licensed nurse
or other licensed healthcare professional; and
(B) Perform the delegated task under the supervision of
the advanced practice registered nurse.
(c) The board shall adopt rules regarding the delegation of the
nursing tasks under this section, including without limitation:
(1) The delegated administration of medications and
immunizations only within the physical boundaries of the clinical setting of
the advanced practice registered nurse;
(2) Evaluation of whether delegation is appropriate according to
the severity of a patient's condition;
(3) Training and competency requirements that shall be met by
the person administering medications and immunizations; and
(4) Other standards and procedures deemed relevant by the board.
(d)(1) An individual to whom a nursing task is delegated is not
authorized to delegate the performance of the nursing task to another
individual.
(2) A certified registered nurse anesthetist is not authorized
to delegate the administration of anesthesia.
(e) This section does not preempt or repeal any state law that
authorizes an individual to perform a particular task.

/s/Pilkington








04-09-2025 15:42:27 JMB075